North Carolina, session 2025, SB409.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 52A of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 14-409B. Ghost guns and undetectable firearms prohibited.
(a) Definition. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Ghost gun. – A firearm, including a frame or receiver, that lacks a unique
serial number engraved or cased in metal alloy on the frame or receiver by a
licensed manufacturer, maker, or importer under federal law or markings in
accordance with 27 C.F.R. § 479.102. This term does not include a firearm
that has been rendered permanently inoperable or a firearm that is not required
to have a serial number in accordance with the federal Gun Control Act of
1968.
(2) Undetectable firearm. – A firearm that satisfies any of the following
requirements:
a. After removal of all parts, other than a major component, is not as
detectable by walk-through metal detectors commonly used at airports
or other public buildings.
b. Any major component of which, if subjected to inspection by the types
of detection devices commonly used at airports or other public
buildings for security screening, would not generate an image that
accurately depicts the shape of the component.
c. Is manufactured wholly of plastic, fiberglass, or through a 3D printing
process.
(b) Prohibition. – Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall
be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to manufacture, sell, give away, transfer, use, or
possess a ghost gun or an undetectable firearm.
(c) Exception. – This section does not apply to federally licensed firearm manufacturers
(Federal Firearm License Type 07) pursuant to Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives
(ATF) regulations.
(d) Punishment. – Any person violating this section is guilty of a Class I felony."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*S409-v-1*